North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-19 Record Title
47-19-50.
Filing bill of sale — Prerequisites.

A bill of sale or other instrument transferring the title to personal property shall be entitled to be filed in the office of the recorder of the county where the property, or any part thereof, covered by such instrument is at the time situated when:

The instrument is signed by the vendor or transferor in the presence of two witnesses who must sign the same as witnesses thereto; or

The execution of the instrument is acknowledged before some official qualified to take acknowledgments.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5960a1; R.C. 1943, § 47-1950; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

47-19-51.
Filing of bill of sale or other instrument — Notice.

The filing of a bill of sale or other instrument which transfers the title to personal property shall operate as notice thereof to all subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers of so much of said property as is situated, at the time of such filing, in the county wherein such instrument is filed.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 141, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 5960a2; R.C. 1943, § 47-1951.

47-19-52.
Bill of sale — Release — Cancellation by recorder.

The recorder shall cancel and discharge, upon the records in the recorder’s office, any bill of sale, upon the filing of a release executed by both parties to the instrument.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 169, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 47-1952; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

47-19-53.
Recording petition, decree of adjudication, or order approving trustee’s bond in bankruptcy proceeding.

When a petition for bankruptcy, or a decree of adjudication, or an order approving the trustee’s bond is made, pursuant to the Federal Bankruptcy Act of 1898, as amended by the Bankruptcy Act of 1938, Chapter 575, 52 Statutes 840, Section 21g, the bankrupt, trustee, receiver, custodian, referee, or any creditor may record a certified copy of the petition, decree, or order in the office of the recorder of any county in this state wherein is located real property of the bankrupt as shown by the schedules of the bankruptcy proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 225, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Note.

The Federal Bankruptcy Act of 1898 was repealed in 1978 by P.L. 95-598. The bankruptcy laws were revised generally and enacted as Title 11, Bankruptcy, by Act Nov. 6, 1978, P.L. 95-598, 92 Stat. 2549, and are compiled at 11 USCS § 101 et seq.

47-19-54.
Sale of real property by contract for deed — Effect on joint tenants.

Any contract for deed for the sale of real property held in joint tenancy shall not have the effect of dissolving the joint tenancy relationship of the vendors if such contract for deed is executed by all the joint tenants unless otherwise specifically provided in the instrument.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 319, § 1.

Collateral References.

Contract of sale or granting of option to purchase, to third party, by both or all of joint tenants or tenants by entirety as severing or terminating tenancy, 39 A.L.R.4th 1068.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Joint Tenancies: Severance by Contract for Deed?, 42 N.D. L. Rev. 351 (1966).

47-19-55.
Authority of North Dakota notaries in other states.

A North Dakota notary may perform a notarial act in another state if that state recognizes the notary’s authority within that state.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 394, § 2.

47-19-56.
Corporate change noted in assignment, satisfaction, or release.

When a change in the name or identity of a corporate mortgagee or assignee of the mortgagee is caused by or results from a merger, consolidation, amendment to charter or articles of incorporation, or conversion of articles of incorporation or charter from federal to state, from state to federal, or from one form of entity to another, a mortgage assignment, satisfaction, or release that is otherwise recordable and that specifies in the body of the instrument the merger, consolidation, amendment, or conversion event causing the change in name or identity is in recordable form. The assignment, satisfaction, or release is entitled to be recorded in the office of the county recorder without further evidence of corporate merger, consolidation, amendment, or conversion. For purposes of assigning, satisfying, or releasing the mortgage, the assignment, satisfaction, or release is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in it with respect to the corporate merger, consolidation, amendment, or conversion, and the county recorder shall rely upon it to assign, satisfy, or release the mortgage.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 397, § 1.

47-19-57.
Authority of mortgagee designated as nominee or agent — Retroactive application.

An assignment, satisfaction, or release is entitled to be recorded in the office of the county recorder and is sufficient to assign, satisfy, or release a mortgage if:

A mortgage is granted to a mortgagee as nominee or agent for a third party identified in the mortgage, and the third party’s successors and assigns;

A subsequent assignment, satisfaction, or release of the mortgage is executed by the mortgagee or the third party, its successors or assigns; and

The assignment, satisfaction, or release is in recordable form.

The county recorder shall rely upon the recorded assignment, satisfaction, or release in subsection 1 to assign, satisfy, or release the mortgage.

This section applies to any mortgage assignment, satisfaction, or release executed, recorded, or filed before, on, or after August 1, 2009.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 397, § 1.